Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.030

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(2) "Director" means the director of licensing.

(3) "Court reporter" means an individual certified under this chapter.

[ 1995 c 269 s 501; 1995 c 27 s 4; 1989 c 382 s 4.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1995 c 27 s 4 and by 1995 c 269 s 501, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—Part headings not law—Severability—1995 c 269: See notes following RCW 18.16.050.